Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 4. Liquidation

Cross references. —

As to cancellation of charter of savings and loan association, see §

13-4-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

9 Am. Jur. 2d Bankruptcy § 39.

12A C.J.S. Building and Loan Associations §§ 243 to 274.

§ 13-6-401.
When state banking commissioner to take charge; refusal to so permit.

If it appears to the state banking commissioner that the affairs of any savings and loan association are in an unsound condition or that it is conducting its business in an unsafe or unlawful manner, the state banking commissioner may take possession of all books, records and assets of the association and hold them pending further proceedings.

If the person in charge of the association refuses to permit the state banking commissioner to take possession, the state banking commissioner shall inform the attorney general who shall take whatever action is necessary to place the state banking commissioner in immediate possession of the property of the association.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 18; R.S. 1931, § 17-118; C.S. 1945, § 36-119; W.S. 1957, § 13-232; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-6-402.
Directors to relieve unsound condition; duty.

If it appears that the affairs of the association are in fact in an unsound condition, the state banking commissioner shall at once notify in writing the board of directors of the association of his decision, giving them twenty (20) days in which to restore the affairs of the association to a sound condition. Meanwhile, the state banking commissioner shall remain in charge of all books, records and assets of the association. He shall attend or be represented at all directors’ and stockholders’ meetings and suggest steps necessary to restore the association to a sound condition.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 18; R.S. 1931, § 17-118; C.S. 1945, § 36-119; W.S. 1957, § 13-232; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-6-403.
Directors to relieve unsound condition; failure.

If the affairs of the association are not restored within the twenty (20) days, the state banking commissioner shall report the facts to the attorney general, who shall institute proceedings in the district court of the proper county for the appointment of a receiver and for the dissolution of the association or other proceedings as may be required.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 18; R.S. 1931, § 17-118; C.S. 1945, § 36-119; W.S. 1957, § 13-232; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-6-404.
Losses exceeding reserves or earnings.

Whenever the losses of an association exceed the reserve account they may be charged against the undivided earnings, if any, and if they also exceed undivided earnings, the state banking commissioner may proceed to wind up the affairs of such association.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 17-114; C.S. 1945, § 36-115; W.S. 1957, § 13-228; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-6-405.
Banking commissioner to be appointed receiver; assistants; bonding requirements.

The state banking commissioner shall be appointed the receiver for any savings and loan association. No fee shall be allowed the state banking commissioner as the receiver, but he may appoint, upon the approval of the court, persons to assist him in any receivership proceedings as may be required. The compensation or fees of persons appointed by the state banking commissioner shall be fixed by the court and shall be paid, together with all other costs and expenses of the receivership, out of the assets of the association. The state banking commissioner may require each of the persons appointed to execute to him a bond as he may deem necessary. The state banking commissioner may designate the federal deposit insurance corporation to act without bond as receiver or liquidator of any savings and loan association whose assets are insured by the corporation and which has been closed for the purpose of liquidation.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 10, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 36-120; W.S. 1957, § 13-233; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “or the office of thrift supervision” following “insurance corporation” in the last sentence.

Cross references. —

As to receivers, see chapter 33 of title 1.

§ 13-6-406.
Priority of claims.

The claim of the owners of guaranty capital stock in an association is junior to the claim of savings and investment account holders and no part of the guaranty capital shall be withdrawn or retired until all savings and investment account holders have been paid in full at par with interest and all other claims have been paid and the corporation is liquidated.

The claim of savings and investment account holders against the association is senior to the guaranty capital stockholders but junior to the claims of general creditors of the association. Savings and investment accounts shall be issued upon a uniform basis and without discrimination.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.